Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.030

Trial by jury—Judgment.

The person, firm, or corporation sought to be enjoined shall be entitled to a trial by jury of the issues within a reasonable time after joinder of issue and a judgment shall be entered by the court within two days of the conclusion of the trial. No injunction or restraining order shall be issued prior to the conclusion of the trial.

[ 1959 c 105 s 3.]